Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202425-1313
Jury trial; judgment by court; entry of order.

When a trial by jury has been had, judgment must be ordered by the court and entered upon the record in conformity to the verdict, unless it is special, or the court orders the case to be reserved for future argument or consideration.

R.S.1867, Code § 438, p. 467;

R.S.1913, § 8006;

C.S.1922, § 8947;

C.S.1929, § 20-1313;

R.S.1943, § 25-1313;

Laws 1961, c. 111, § 3, p. 350;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 39.

Entering judgment in conformity with the verdict is a ministerial duty under this section. Khaitov v. Greater Omaha Packing Co., 319 Neb. 932, 25 N.W.3d 739 (2025).

There was no compliance with this section or its alternatives. Northwestern Public Service Co. v. Juhl, 177 Neb. 625, 129 N.W.2d 570 (1964).

It is the duty of the clerk to render judgment on verdict. Webber v. City of Scottsbluff, 155 Neb. 48, 50 N.W.2d 533 (1951).

Judgment was properly entered the same day verdict was received. Hamaker v. Patrick, 123 Neb. 809, 244 N.W. 420 (1932); Wiegand v. Lincoln Traction Co., 123 Neb. 766, 244 N.W. 298 (1932).

When verdict is general, it is clerk's duty to render judgment in conformity therewith, unless otherwise ordered. Crete Mills v. Stevens, 120 Neb. 794, 235 N.W. 453 (1931).

Where jury verdict finds for plaintiff but awards incorrect amount, court cannot recompute and enter judgment for proper amount; only remedy is motion for new trial. Kenesaw Mill & Elevator Co. v. Aufdenkamp, 106 Neb. 246, 183 N.W. 294 (1921).

It is error to enter judgment for amount of verdict if in excess of amount claimed; party may remit. Davis v. Hall, 70 Neb. 678, 97 N.W. 1023 (1904).

Court may reserve case on specific law points which must be stated in record; not on sufficiency of evidence. Barge v. Haslam, 65 Neb. 656, 91 N.W. 528 (1902).

Failure to enter judgment at term; court may enter later. Toogood v. Russell, 3 Neb. Unof. 189, 91 N.W. 249 (1902).